Hawaii statutes.
[Part VI.] LIMITATIONS ON PUBLIC ENTITY LIABILITY IN ACTIONS

BASED UPON DUTY TO WARN OF NATURAL CONDITIONS

[§663-51]
Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Board"
means the board of land and natural resources.

"Improved public lands" means lands
designated as part of the state park system, parks, and parkways under chapter
184, or as part of a county's park system, and lands which are part of the
Hawaii statewide trail and access system under chapter 198D, excluding
buildings and structures constructed upon such lands. For purposes of this
part, "improved public lands" excludes ocean and submerged lands.

"Public
entity" means "government entity" as defined in section
663-10.5. [L 2003, c 82, pt of §2, §8; am L 2007, c 152, §5; am
L 2008, c 144, §1; am L 2009, c 81, §3; am
L 2014, c 86, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next